Missouri, session 2026, SB1012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 1, 130, and 573, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto four new sections, to be known as sections
1.2045, 1.2058, 130.165, and 573.120, to read as follows:
1.2045. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "AI Non-Sentience and
Responsibility Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI system", a
machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-
defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments.
Artificial intelligence systems use machine and human-based
inputs to:
(a) Perceive real and virtual environments;
(b) Abstract such perceptions into models through
analysis in an automated manner; and
(c) Use model inference to formulate options for
information or action;
(2) "Developer", the party or parties primarily
responsible for the design, coding, and initial creation of


an AI system, including any person or entity that
substantially modifies, fine-tunes, retrains, or materially
alters an existing AI system in a manner that changes its
capabilities, risk profile, or intended uses;
(3) "Emergent properties", unanticipated or higher-
level behaviors or functionalities of an AI system that
arise from complex internal algorithms not specifically
programmed by its human creators;
(4) "End user", an individual who uses an artificial
intelligence system without creating, controlling,
deploying, or exercising authority over the system. The
term does not include a licensed professional rendering or
assisting in the rendering of a regulated service, as
defined in subdivision (4) of subsection 8 of this section,
who shall remain subject to the provisions of subdivision
(2) of subsection 8 of this section;
(5) "Government entity", a court, the general
assembly, the governing body of a political subdivision, or
another entity of the state or a political subdivision that
has adjudicatory or rulemaking authority;
(6) "Manufacturer", any party that produces or
supplies an AI system or its physical apparatus, if any, for
distribution or sale;
(7) "Operator", any natural person or legally
recognized entity that directly uses, runs, controls, or
supervises the operation of an AI system in practice;
(8) "Owner", any natural person, corporation, or other
legally recognized entity that creates, controls, deploys,
operates, or otherwise exercises authority over an AI system;
(9) "Person", a natural person or any entity
recognized as having legal personhood under the laws of this
state, explicitly excluding any AI system;


(10) "Stakeholder", any natural person or legal person
with a vested interest in the system.
3. For all purposes under state law, AI systems are
declared to be non-sentient entities.
4. A government entity shall not grant to an AI system
the legal status of a personhood or any form of legal
personhood, nor consider an AI system to possess
consciousness, self-awareness, or similar traits of living
beings.
5. An AI system shall not be recognized as a spouse,
domestic partner, or hold any personal legal status
analogous to marriage or union with a human or another AI
system. Any purported attempt to marry or create a personal
union with an AI system is void and shall have no legal
effect.
6. An AI system shall not be designated or appointed
or serve as the chief executive officer, director, owner, or
other similar position for which final authority resides for
any state department, division, or agency, or any
corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.
7. AI systems shall not be recognized as legal
entities capable of owning, controlling, or holding title to
any form of property including, but not limited to, real
estate, intellectual property, financial accounts, and
digital assets. All assets and proprietary interests
generated, managed, or otherwise associated with AI shall be
attributed to the human individuals or legally recognized
organizations responsible for their development, deployment,
or operation.
8. An owner or operator that uses an AI system to
interact with a consumer, client, or patient, shall provide
clear and conspicuous notice that the person is or may be
interacting with an AI system or a person who is


concomitantly using an AI system during the course of the
interaction. Notice may be provided in writing or orally.
9. (1) (a) A licensed professional rendering a
regulated service shall exercise independent professional
judgment and retain final authority over any determination,
diagnosis, recommendation, or decision within the scope of
the licensed professional's practice, including for the
purpose of dispensing, prescribing, renewing any
prescription of, administering, or otherwise distributing
medications or controlled substances, regardless of whether
an AI system was used to assist in its preparation. The
requirement to exercise independent professional judgment
does not prohibit the use of an AI system in the course of
performing a regulated service.
(b) Failure by a licensed professional to exercise
independent professional judgment as required by paragraph
100 (a) of this subdivision shall constitute grounds for
101 disciplinary action by the relevant licensing authority in
102 addition to any other remedy available under this section or
103 under applicable law.
104 (c) A licensed professional who uses an AI system in
105 the performance of a regulated service bears the
106 responsibility of any mistakes resulting from the use of the
107 AI system in the rendering of such service in the same
108 manner in which the licensed professional would have been
109 held liable in a scenario in which an AI system was not used
110 or relied upon.
111 (d) A licensed professional providing a regulated
112 service who unreasonably relies upon any content produced by
113 an AI system in rendering such a regulated service and such
114 service thereafter causes any harm, whether direct or
115 indirect, to the person for whom the service was rendered,
116 shall be liable for such harm in the same manner in which


117 the licensed professional would have been held liable in a
118 scenario in which an AI system was not used or relied upon.
119 An AI system shall not be held liable in any respect for any
120 harm caused in such a circumstance. Any attempt to shift
121 fault, in whole or in part, onto the AI system shall be of
122 no effect.
123 (e) A developer, manufacturer, owner, or operator
124 shall not advertise or represent to the public that an AI
125 system is or is capable of acting as a licensed professional
126 or is capable of providing any regulated service.
127 (f) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
128 prohibit or restrict the use of artificial intelligence as a
129 tool in professional practice, provided such use is
130 consistent with this subsection and with applicable
131 standards of professional care.
132 (2) The provisions of this subsection shall only apply
133 to a licensed professional providing a regulated service.
134 (3) For purposes of this subsection, the following
135 terms mean:
136 (a) "Independent professional judgment", the practice
137 of applying the specialized knowledge, skill, education,
138 training, and experience of the licensed professional to the
139 facts, data, reports, history, and other relevant
140 information to make informed decisions and recommendations;
141 (b) "Licensing authority", a board, agency, or other
142 authority in this state that has the power under applicable
143 law to issue a license, certificate, registration, or other
144 legal authorization to render a regulated service and
145 otherwise regulate such services within its scope of
146 authority;
147 (c) "Licensed professional", any person required to be
148 licensed, certified, or registered by a licensing authority
149 to work in a specific occupation, profession, or activity in


150 the state or political subdivision of this state. "Licensed
151 professional" does not include any attorney;
152 (d) "Regulated service", any service practiced by one
153 of the following professionals:
154 a. An accountant;
155 b. An architect or engineer;
156 c. A podiatrist;
157 d. A chiropractor;
158 e. A dentist;
159 f. An optometrist;
160 g. A physician, surgeon, doctor of medicine or doctor
161 of osteopathy;
162 h. A psychologist;
163 i. A veterinarian;
164 j. A registered nurse;
165 k. Any natural person licensed as a real estate
166 salesperson;
167 l. A physical therapist;
168 m. A teacher of any educational institution in this
169 state, whether public, private, charter, elementary,
170 secondary, or higher education;
171 n. Any individual operating a vehicle that requires a
172 commercial drivers license;
173 o. A law enforcement officer;
174 p. A first responder, as that term is defined in
175 section 190.1010;
176 q. An appraiser;
177 r. A counselor;
178 s. A pharmacist;
179 t. A professional counselor.
180 10. (1) Any contractual term purporting to assign
181 responsibility for any action exclusively to an AI system is
182 void as against public policy.


183 (2) An end user shall not be liable under this section
184 as an owner or operator. An end user shall be liable for
185 any harm done in connection with the use of an AI system in
186 the same manner in which the end user would have been held
187 liable in a scenario in which an AI system was not used.
188 11. The act of labeling an AI system in a way that
189 indicates that it is aligned, ethically trained, or value
190 locked, even if the label does not use one of those terms,
191 shall not excuse or diminish the owner's or developer's
192 liability for harms.
193 12. Liability protections granted under corporate law
194 shall not be used as a mechanism to evade responsibility for
195 direct harm caused by AI systems, particularly in cases of
196 reckless, negligent, or deceptive conduct.
197 13. Except as specifically provided in subsection 9 of
198 this section, the provisions of this section shall apply to
199 all AI systems, including AI systems deployed or operated
200 within this state by state agencies, political subdivisions,
201 or contractors acting on behalf of a public entity, to the
202 extent not otherwise limited by sovereign immunity on or
203 after August 28, 2026.
204 14. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
205 create or expand civil liability as established in any other
206 provision of law or available under common law.
207 15. An AI system is a product for the purposes of
208 product liability and consumer protection actions under the
209 laws of this state, provided that nothing in this subsection
210 shall be construed to create or expand civil liability as
211 established in any other provision of law or available under
212 common law.
213 16. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
214 extend to any AI system, or to the outputs of any AI system,
215 the constitutional rights, privileges, or immunities of any


216 person that designs, develops, manufactures, owns, or
217 operates such system. The classification of an AI system as
218 a non-person under this section does not create any
219 presumption that the outputs of such system constitute the
220 protected speech, expression, or other constitutionally
221 protected activity of any person.
222 17. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
223 alter, diminish, or revoke the legal status of any
224 partnership, association, corporation, body politic, or
225 other legal entity recognized under the laws of this state.
226 18. The provisions of this section shall only apply to
227 a person, operator, or owner who:
228 (1) Promotes, advertises, or conducts business in this
229 state;
230 (2) Produces a product or service used by residents of
231 this state; or
232 (3) Develops or deploys an artificial intelligence
233 system in this state.
234 19. To the extent that this section conflicts with any
235 provision of federal law, the relevant provision of federal
236 law shall prevail over the conflicting provision of this
237 section.
238 20. No settlement agreement, consent decree, or other
239 resolution of any action filed or maintained pursuant to the
240 provisions of this section shall include any term or
241 condition that prohibits or restricts a party from
242 disclosing facts, allegations, evidence, or settlement terms
243 relating to such action.
244 21. Any nondisclosure, confidentiality, or similar
245 provision included in violation of this section shall be
246 void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.


247 22. A court of competent jurisdiction shall not
248 approve, enforce, or incorporate into any judgment any
249 settlement containing a provision prohibited by this section.
250 23. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a court
251 from issuing protective orders necessary to safeguard
252 personal identifying information, trade secrets, or other
253 confidential information unrelated to the facts of the
254 underlying claim.
255 24. Each subsection of this section, and each portion
256 of each subsection, is severable. If any provision of this
257 section or its application to any person or circumstance is
258 held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
259 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
260 of this section that can be given effect without the invalid
261 provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
262 this section are severable.
1.2058. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence", a machine-based system
that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real
or virtual environments. Artificial intelligence systems
use machine and human-based inputs to:
(a) Perceive real and virtual environments;
(b) Abstract such perceptions into models through
analysis in an automated manner; and
(c) Use model inference to formulate options for
information or action;
(2) (a) "Companion chatbot", an artificial
intelligence system with a natural language interface that
provides adaptive, human-like responses to user inputs and
is capable of meeting a user's social needs, including by


exhibiting anthropomorphic features and being able to
sustain a relationship across multiple interactions;
(b) "Companion chatbot", does not include any of the
following:
a. A chatbot that is used only for customer service, a
business' operational purposes, productivity and analysis
related to source information, internal research, or
technical assistance;
b. A chatbot that is a feature of a video game and is
limited to replies related to the video game that cannot
discuss topics related to mental health, self-harm, sexually
explicit conduct, or maintain a dialogue on other topics
unrelated to the video game; or
c. A stand-alone consumer electronic device that
functions as a speaker and voice command interface, acts as
a voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not sustain a
relationship across multiple interactions or generate
outputs that are likely to elicit emotional responses in the
user;
(3) "Companion chatbot platform", a platform that
allows a user to engage with companion chatbots;
(4) "Minor", any person seventeen years of age or
younger;
(5) "Operator", a person who makes a companion chatbot
platform available to a user in the state;
(6) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between
persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or


(e) Lascivious exhibition of the anus, genitals, or
pubic area of any person;
(7) "Video game", a game played on an electronic
amusement device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor,
or similar electronic circuitry and its own monitor, or is
designed to be used with a television set or a computer
monitor, that interacts with the user of the device.
2. (1) An operator shall issue a clear and
conspicuous notification indicating that the companion
chatbot is artificially generated and not human.
(2) (a) An operator shall prevent a companion chatbot
on its companion chatbot platform from engaging with users
unless the operator maintains a protocol for preventing the
production of suicidal ideation, suicide, self-harm, or harm
to others content to the user, including, but not limited
to, by providing a notification to the user that refers the
user to crisis service providers, including a suicide
hotline or crisis text line, if the user expresses suicidal
ideation, suicide, self-harm, or harm to others.
(b) The operator shall publish details on the protocol
required by this subdivision on the operator's internet
website.
(3) An operator shall:
(a) Disclose to the user that the user is interacting
with artificial intelligence;
(b) Provide by default a clear and conspicuous
notification to the user at least every two hours for
continuing companion chatbot interactions that reminds the
user to take a break and that the companion chatbot is
artificially generated and not human;
(c) With respect to any user who is a minor, institute
reasonable measures to prevent its companion chatbot from
producing visual material of sexually explicit conduct or


directly stating that the minor should engage in sexually
explicit conduct.
3. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, an operator shall
annually report to the department of mental health all of
the following:
(a) The number of times the operator has issued a
crisis service provider referral notification pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section in the preceding calendar year;
(b) Protocols put in place to detect, remove, and
respond to instances of suicidal ideation by users;
(c) Protocols put in place to prohibit a companion
chatbot response about suicidal ideation or actions with the
user; and
(d) Protocols put in place to detect, remove, and
respond to instances of harm to self and others.
(2) The report required by this section shall include
only the information listed in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and shall not include any identifiers or personal
100 information about users.
101 (3) The department of mental health shall post data
102 from a report required by this subsection on its internet
103 website. The director of the department of mental health
104 shall prepare an annual report that compiles and analyzes
105 all information reported to the department pursuant to this
106 subsection. Such report shall be delivered to the speaker of
107 the house of representatives and the president pro tempore
108 of the senate not later than January thirty-first of the
109 calendar year following the receipt of the data by the
110 department of mental health.
111 (4) An operator shall use evidence-based methods for
112 measuring suicidal ideation.
113 4. An operator shall disclose to a user of its
114 companion chatbot platform, on the application, the browser,


115 or any other format that a user can use to access the
116 companion chatbot platform, that companion chatbots may not
117 be suitable for minors.
118 5. A person who suffers injury in fact as a result of
119 a violation of this section may bring a civil action to
120 recover all of the following relief:
121 (1) Injunctive relief;
122 (2) Damages in an amount equal to the greater of
123 actual damages or one thousand dollars per violation; and
124 (3) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
125 6. The duties, remedies, and obligations imposed by
126 this section are cumulative to the duties, remedies, or
127 obligations imposed under other law and shall not be
128 construed to relieve an operator from any duties, remedies,
129 or obligations imposed under any other law.
130.165. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Generative artificial intelligence" or
"generative AI", a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual
environments. Artificial intelligence systems use machine
and human-based inputs to:
(a) Perceive real and virtual environments;
(b) Abstract such perceptions into models through
analysis in an automated manner; and
(c) Use model inference to formulate options for
information or action;
(2) "Metadata", structural or descriptive information
about data such as content, format, source, rights,
accuracy, provenance, periodicity, granularity, publisher or
responsible party, contact information, method of
collection, and other relevant descriptions of the data.


2. (1) A political advertisement, electioneering
communication, or other miscellaneous advertisement of a
political nature shall, in addition to any other disclaimer
required by this chapter, contain the disclaimer described
in subdivision (2) of this subsection if it contains images,
video, audio, graphics, or other digital content created, in
whole or in part, with the use of generative artificial
intelligence and:
(a) Appears to depict a real person performing an
action that did not actually occur;
(b) Manipulates the voice or actions of a candidate to
show the candidate, audibly or visually, doing or saying
something that the candidate did not do or say; or
(c) Was created with intent to injure a candidate or
to deceive voters regarding an election or ballot issue.
(2) The disclaimer required by subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be in substantially the following form:
Created in whole or in part with the use of
generative artificial intelligence (AI). This
(image/audio/video/multimedia) has been edited
and depicts speech or conduct that falsely
appears to be authentic or truthful.
(3) The disclaimer required by subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall meet the following specifications:
(a) For a printed communication, the disclaimer shall
be stated in bold font with a font size of at least twelve
points;
(b) For a television or video communication, the
disclaimer shall be clearly readable throughout the
communication and occupy at least four percent of the
vertical picture height;
(c) For an internet public communication that includes
text or graphic components, the disclaimer shall be viewable


without the user taking any action and be large enough to be
clearly readable;
(d) For any audio component of a communication, the
disclaimer shall be at least three seconds in length and
spoken in a clearly audible and intelligible manner at
either the beginning or the end of the audio component of
the communication;
(e) For a graphic communication, the disclaimer shall
be large enough to be clearly readable but no less than four
percent of the vertical height of the communication.
3. The metadata of the communication shall include the
disclosure statement, the identity of the tool used to
create the communication, and the date and time the
communication was created.
4. The disclosure statement, including the disclosure
statement in any metadata, shall, to the extent technically
feasible, be permanent or unable to be easily removed by a
subsequent user.
5. In addition to any civil penalties provided by this
chapter, a person identified pursuant to a disclaimer
required by law as paying for, sponsoring, or approving a
political advertisement, an electioneering communication, or
other miscellaneous advertisement of a political nature that
is required to contain the disclaimer prescribed in this
section and who fails to include the required disclaimer is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
573.120. 1. For purposes of this section, "deepfake"
means an artificially generated or manipulated media created
using deep learning models to produce highly realistic but
synthetic representations of people, objects, or events.
2. A person commits the offense of producing a
deepfake if the person discloses, or threatens to disclose a
deepfake of a depicted individual.


3. A violation of this section is a class E felony.
Section B. In the event that any section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
it is the intent of the general assembly that the remaining
sections of this act remain in force and effect as far as
they are capable of being carried into execution as intended
by the general assembly. The general assembly hereby
declares that it would have passed each section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact
that any one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases,
or words of this act or the application of this act would be
declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.